Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202550-1702
Legislative Oversight Committee; duties.

The Legislative Oversight Committee shall:

(1) Oversee all aspects of the Division of Legislative Oversight without regard to special or partisan interests and in accordance with relevant standards and guidelines;

(2) Direct the work of the division through the approval of annual work plans and by ensuring that such work is carried out in accordance with relevant statutes;

(3) Approve key performance indicators for the division;

(4) Receive quarterly briefings from the Director of Legislative Oversight or other division staff; and

(5) Carry out the committee's duties under the Legislative Performance Audit Act, the Office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare Act, and the Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System Act.

Laws 2025, LB298, § 23.

Legislative Performance Audit Act, see section 50-1201.

Office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare Act, see section 50-1801.

Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System Act, see section 50-1901.